Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.210

Businesses using the office—Fees.

The office may charge a reasonable fee or other appropriate charge, to be set by rule adopted by the office under chapter 34.05 RCW, to a business using the services of the office.

[ 1993 c 195 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date of 1993 c 195—1993 sp.s. c 24: See note following RCW 39.19.200.